Massachusetts, session 194th, H311.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. This section requires the calculation of area median income in a
municipality having a population over one hundred thousand to be based on the zip code.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 40H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “agency” in line 10, the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where median income
shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the dwelling unit or project is located;”
SECTION 3. Section 2 of chapter 40R of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 6, the
words: -
of 7

“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where areawide
median income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the housing or project is
located;”
SECTION 4. Section 6 of chapter 40R of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development,” in line 35, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the residential units or projects are
located;”
SECTION 5. Section 1 of chapter 40T of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in lines 29, 36,
62, and 158 the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the housing or project is located;”
SECTION 6. Section 2 of chapter 44B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in lines 46 and
58, the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where areawide
median income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the housing or project is
located;”
of 7

SECTION 7. Section 1 of chapter 60 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “guidelines” in line 10, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which the housing with an affordable
housing restriction or similar projects are located;”
SECTION 8. Section 6I of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “guidelines” in line 34, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
income shall be proportional to the specific zip code in which a qualified low-income housing
project or similar projects are located;”
SECTION 9. Section 6M of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 106-107, the words “or any
successor legislation and the regulation promulgated thereunder” and inserting after the words
“42 U.S.C. 1437(a)(B)(2) in line 106, the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where median income
shall be determined and proportional to the specific zip code in which the household is located.”
SECTION 10. Section 31H of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “family size” in line 35, the
words: -
of 7

“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which a qualified low-
income housing project or similar projects are located.”
SECTION 11. Section 6M of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 106-107, the words “or any
successor legislation and the regulations promulgated thereafter” and inserting after the words
“42 U.S.C. 1437(a)(B)(2) in line 106, the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where median income
shall be determined and proportional to the specific zip code in which the household is located.”
SECTION 12. Section 26 of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 184, the words “the department” and
inserting after the words “determined by” in line 184, the words: -
“and proportional to the specific zip code in which the housing is to be constructed or
rehabilitated,”
SECTION 13. Section 26 of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 268, the words “the department” and
inserting after the words “defined by” in line 268, the words: -
“the specific zip code in which the site for housing is located.”
SECTION 14. Section 38D of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “household size” in lines
16, 22, 36, and 48-49 the words: -
of 7

“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the
housing or similar projects are located.”
SECTION 15. Section 38D of chapter 121B of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 27,
the words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which an
affordable housing development or similar projects are located.”
SECTION 16. Section 1 of chapter 121E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 17, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the
alternative forms of rental and ownership housing or similar projects are located.”
SECTION 17. Section 1 of chapter 121F of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 6, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the
affordable housing developments or similar projects are located.”
of 7

SECTION 18. Section 1 of chapter 121G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 5, the
words: -
“,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the
federal-assisted housing or similar projects are located.”
SECTION 19. Section 15 of chapter 167C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
100 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 44, the
101 words: -
102 “,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
103 household income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the
104 persons who shall receive the benefits and assistance provided by said fund are located.”
105 SECTION 20. Section 7A of chapter 167E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016
106 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 7, the
107 words: -
108 “,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
109 income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the applicant’s
110 mortgaged property is located.”
111 SECTION 21. Section 65C ½ of chapter 171 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
112 2016 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “Development” in line 7,
113 the words: -
of 7

114 “,except in municipalities having a population of 100,000 or more, where area median
115 income shall be determined by and proportional to the specific zip code in which the applicant’s
116 mortgaged property is located.”
117 SECTION 22. This act shall take effect immediately.
of 7